Washington statutes.
RCW 39.60.030

Obligations eligible as collateral security.

Wherever, by statute of this state, collateral is required as security for the deposit of funds; or deposits are required to be made with any public official or department; or an investment of capital or surplus, or a reserve or other fund is required to be maintained consisting of designated securities, the bonds and other securities herein made eligible for investment shall also be eligible for such purpose.

[ 2016 c 152 s 15; 1939 c 32 s 2; 1935 c 11 s 2; 1933 ex.s. c 37 s 3; RRS s 5545-3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1933 ex.s. c 37: See note following RCW 39.60.010.